Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB316.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(c) and (x) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are amended to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(c) The term "employe" [does not include (1) any individual employed in agriculture or in the domestic service of any person, (2) any individuals who, as a part of their employment, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 reside in the personal residence of the employer, (3) any individual employed by said individual's parents, spouse or child.] means an individual subject to an employer's power to control the nature and parameters of the individual's activities, including hiring, firing, training, scheduling, directing work and proscribing the manner in which the work should be completed. The term does not include:(1) an individual who is employed by and who works on a casual basis in a home or personal residence of another individual; or(2) an individual employed by the individual's parent, spouse or child.* * *(x) The term "independent contractor" includes:(1) any person who is subject to the provisions governing any of the professions and occupations regulated by State licensing laws enforced by the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs in the Department of State, or is included in [the Fair Housing Act (Public Law 90-284, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.).] 42 U.S.C. Ch. 45 (relating to fair housing); or(2) any person, other than an employe, who performs a service for remuneration under a contract, written or oral, express or implied, for an employer.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0316PN0250 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425